test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kassa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:


  Noun - kassa: # - ok
    kassa+N+Sg+Nom:  kassa
    kassa+N+Sg+Gen:  kaˊṣa
    kassa+N+Sg+Ill:  kaaṣan
    kassa+N+Sg+Loc:  kassaast
    kassa+N+Sg+Com:  kassain
    kassa+N+Sg+Abe:  kaˊṣattáá
    kassa+N+Ess:  kassan
    kassa+N+Par:  kassad
    kassa+N+Pl+Nom:  kaˊṣah
    kassa+N+Pl+Gen:  kaˊṣai
    kassa+N+Pl+Acc:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Ill:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Loc:  kassain
    kassa+N+Pl+Com:  kaˊṣaiguin
    kassa+N+Pl+Abe:  kaˊṣaittáá
